Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 1

Counties Generally

5-1-101. Enumeration of counties.

The state is divided into the following counties: Anderson, Bedford, Benton, Bledsoe, Blount, Bradley, Campbell, Cannon, Carroll, Carter, Cheatham, Chester, Claiborne, Clay, Cocke, Coffee, Crockett, Cumberland, Davidson, Decatur, DeKalb, Dickson, Dyer, Fayette, Fentress, Franklin, Gibson, Giles, Grainger, Greene, Grundy, Hamblen, Hamilton, Hancock, Hardeman, Hardin, Hawkins, Haywood, Henderson, Henry, Hickman, Houston, Humphreys, Jackson, Jefferson, Johnson, Knox, Lake, Lauderdale, Lawrence, Lewis, Lincoln, Loudon, Macon, Madison, Marion, Marshall, Maury, McMinn, McNairy, Meigs, Monroe, Montgomery, Moore, Morgan, Obion, Overton, Perry, Pickett, Polk, Putnam, Rhea, Roane, Robertson, Rutherford, Scott, Sequatchie, Sevier, Shelby, Smith, Stewart, Sullivan, Sumner, Tipton, Trousdale, Unicoi, Union, Van Buren, Warren, Washington, Wayne, Weakley, White, Williamson and Wilson.

Code 1858, § 75; Shan., § 92a; Code 1932, § 110; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-101.

Cross-References. Acts fixing boundaries left unrepealed, § 1-2-105.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Cities and counties lack statutory authority to regulate mortgage transactions, OAG 03-016, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/11/03).

Collateral References.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to provide police protection. 90 A.L.R.5th 273.

5-1-102. Jurisdiction over boundary waters.

Counties bounded by a stream or other waters shall have concurrent jurisdiction over the whole of the waters lying between them.

Code 1858, § 405; Shan., § 497; Code 1932, § 743; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-102.

Cross-References. State boundary waters, §§ 4-1-103, 4-1-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — 1963 Tennessee Survey (James C. Kirby, Jr.), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 944 (1964).

5-1-103. Corporate capacity.

Every county is a corporation and the members of the legislative body of each county assembled are the representatives of the county and authorized to act for it.

Code 1858, § 402; Shan., § 493; Code 1932, § 739; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-103.

5-1-104. County officers — Filling vacancies.

Each organized county shall have, in addition to the judicial officers elected by the qualified voters or by the county legislative body, such other officers as are authorized by law to manage county business.

Vacancies in county offices required by the Constitution of Tennessee or by any statutory provision to be filled by the people shall be filled by the county legislative body, and any person so appointed shall serve until a successor is elected at the next general election, as defined in § 2-1-104, in the county and is qualified. The county legislative body shall be required to make an appointment to fill a vacancy within one hundred twenty (120) days of receiving notice of the vacancy unless during that time period there is a general election scheduled in the county and there is sufficient time for the vacancy to be placed on the ballot in accordance with this section. Any appointment to fill a vacancy by the county legislative body shall be made in accordance with chapter 5, part 1 of this title. This subdivision (b)(1) shall not apply to any county that has a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. This subdivision (b)(1) shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than eight hundred ninety-seven thousand four hundred (897,400) nor more than eight hundred ninety-seven thousand five hundred (897,500), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

If the vacancy occurs after the time for filing nominating petitions for the party primary election and more than sixty (60) days before the party primary election, then nominees of political parties shall be selected in such primary election and a successor elected in the August general election. If the vacancy occurs less than sixty (60) days before the party primary election but sixty (60) days or more before the August election, then nominees of political parties shall be selected by party convention and a successor elected in the August election. If the vacancy occurs less than sixty (60) days before the August election but sixty (60) days or more before the November election, then nominees of political parties shall be selected by party convention and a successor elected in the November election.

If a vacancy occurs more than ten (10) days prior to the regular qualifying deadline, then the regular qualifying deadline shall apply. If the vacancy occurs after the tenth day prior to the regular qualifying deadline, independent candidates and candidates nominated by any political party for the vacancies shall qualify by filing all nominating petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the fifty-fifth day before the election. If the qualifying deadline is the fifty-fifth day before the election, candidates must withdraw no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the fifty-second day before the election.

Notwithstanding any law or any provision of any charter of a metropolitan government to the contrary, whenever an election is held to fill a vacancy in a county office that is elected from districts, including, but not limited to, county school board members, county legislative body members, county highway commissions, and constables, the county legislative body may provide by resolution duly certified to the county election commission that persons qualifying as candidates shall be elected from the most recently adopted reapportionment plan in the county. If the county legislative body requires the election to be held using districts as adopted in the most recently adopted reapportionment plan in the county, the county legislative body shall specify to the county election commission which district shall be used to fill the vacancy by election. In the absence of a resolution requiring the latest reapportionment plan be used and specifying which district shall be used for the election, the election shall be held using the district as constituted for the election of the vacated incumbent.

Code 1858, § 406 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 7, § 1); impl. am. Acts 1870, ch. 98, § 1; Shan., § 498; Code 1932, § 744; Acts 1975, ch. 354, § 1; 1978, ch. 934, §§ 2, 24; 1979, ch. 10, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-104; Acts 1981, ch. 314, § 1; 1981, ch. 318, § 1; 1992, ch. 707, § 1; 1997, ch. 558, §§ 24, 25; 2007, ch. 125, § 8; 2008, ch. 871, § 1; 2013, ch. 231, § 11.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1992, ch. 707, § 2 provided that the 1992 amendment by that act (subsection (c)) applies to elections for office for which the qualifying deadline occurs after April 13, 1992.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. County and other public officers and employees, title 8.

Filling a vacancy in the office of constable, § 8-10-118.

Methods of nomination for office, § 2-13-203.

Nominating petitions, filing requirements and deadlines, § 2-5-101.

Officers elected by county legislative body, § 5-5-111.

Public administrators, guardians and trustees, title 30, ch. 1, part 4.

Special elections, title 2, ch. 14.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 6; 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 13.

Attorney General Opinions. Vacancies on county commission's or county boards of education before 1992 elections, OAG 91-98, 1991 Tenn. AG LEXIS 110 (12/5/91).

T.C.A. § 5-1-104 specifies no time within which the county commission must fill the vacancy, and the law imposes no penalty if the commission leaves the position vacant until it is filled at the next county general election, OAG 04-075, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 67 (4/23/04).

Filling of vacancies in county offices, OAG 07-022 (2/27/07).

Open Meetings Act and appointments by county legislative body. OAG 10-126, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 132 (12/30/10).

Status of interim county mayor as member of county commission. OAG 11-2, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/7/11).

Vacancy on county commission. OAG 12-79, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (7/31/12).

5-1-105. Suits against counties.

Suits may be maintained against a county for any just claim, as against other corporations.

Code 1858, § 403 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 15, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 494; Code 1932, § 740; Acts 1972, ch. 565, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-105.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 85.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 30.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of special school district to settle litigation with county, OAG 97-104, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 99 (7/28/97).

5-1-106. Suits for use of counties.

Suits for the use and benefit of any county in this state against any delinquent officer or such officer's sureties, for moneys or funds due such county, shall be brought in the name of the state of Tennessee, for the use of the county for the benefit of which such suit may be brought.

Acts 1875, ch. 27, § 1; Shan., § 495; Code 1932, § 741; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-106.

Cross-References. Power to bring suit for termination of use of land as cemetery, § 46-4-103.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 85.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 29.

Law Reviews.

Justiciability in Tennessee, Part Two: Standing (Barbara Kritchevsky), 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 179 (1985).

5-1-107. Mandamus to enforce county duties.

The performance of any duty made incumbent by law upon the county may be enforced by mandamus from the circuit court, according to the nature of the case.

Code 1858, § 537; Shan., § 684; Code 1932, § 1080; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-107.

Cross-References. Mandamus, title 29, ch. 25.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 31; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Methods of Judicial Review over Administrative Actions in Tennessee, 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 657 (1984).

5-1-108. Division into districts.

The different counties shall be laid off, as the general assembly may direct, into districts of convenient size, so that the whole number in each county shall not be more than twenty-five (25), or four (4) for every one hundred square miles (100 sq. mi.).

Code 1858, § 76 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, § 15); Shan., § 94; Code 1932, § 112; T.C.A (orig. ed.), § 5-108.

Cross-References. Consolidation of counties, reduction to 25 districts, § 5-3-108.

Reapportionment of county legislative body districts, § 5-1-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 7.

5-1-109. Continuation of existing districts.

The districts already laid off in the several counties shall continue until altered in the manner pointed out by law.

Code 1858, § 77 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 1, § 2); Shan., § 95; Code 1932, § 113; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-109.

5-1-110. District maps and boundaries.

The county legislative body shall make, or have made, a map showing civil districts of the county and shall have typed or printed a description of the boundaries of the civil districts.

The county legislative body shall make, or have made, a map showing the county districts from which the members are elected to the county legislative body. The county legislative body may also make, or have made, a census block equivalency file or a typed or printed description of the boundaries of the county districts. In the event of any discrepancy between the boundaries set forth on the map showing the county districts from which the members are elected to the county legislative body and the census block equivalency file or typed or printed description of the boundaries of the county districts, the boundaries set forth on the map shall control.

A copy of the map or maps and the accompanying descriptions of the civil district boundaries and, if any, the county district boundaries shall be filed with the county clerk, and a copy also shall be filed with the secretary of state and the comptroller of the treasury.

Revised maps shall be filed within ninety (90) days of any revision in any civil district or any other district from which members of the county legislative body are elected.

Code 1858, § 80 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 1, § 6); Shan., § 98; Code 1932, § 115; Acts 1968, ch. 599, § 9; 1978, ch. 934, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-110; Acts 2011, ch. 96, §§ 1-3; 2018, ch. 528, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “The county legislative body shall make, or have made, a map showing civil districts of the county and, on the same or on a separate map, the county districts from which the members are elected to the county legislative body, and shall have typed or printed a description of the boundaries of the civil districts. A description of the boundaries of the county districts may be typed or printed if the map is not of sufficient detail to delineate the boundaries of the county districts.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 528, § 2. March 7, 2018.

Cross-References. Filing by secretary of state, § 8-3-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 251; 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 7.

5-1-111. County legislative bodies — Reapportionment.

Prior to January 1, 1982, and at least every ten (10) years thereafter, county legislative bodies of the different counties shall meet and, a majority of the members being present and concurring, shall change the boundaries of districts or redistrict a county entirely if necessary to apportion the county legislative body so that the members represent substantially equal populations.

The county legislative body may increase or decrease the number of districts when the reapportionments are made.

A county legislative body may reapportion at any time if the county legislative body deems such action necessary to maintain substantially equal representation based on population.

The county legislative body must use the latest federal census data whenever a reapportionment is made.

Districts shall be reasonably compact and contiguous and shall not overlap.

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2), in the establishment of boundaries for districts, no precinct shall be split.

Upon written certification by the coordinator of elections, a county election commission may establish a precinct that encompasses two (2) or more districts in any county that has twenty (20) or more county legislative body districts. In making this determination the coordinator of elections shall consider, among other things, the type of voting equipment used in the county, as well as the racial makeup of the districts and the cost savings to the county.

Upon application of any citizen of the county affected, the chancery court of such county shall have original jurisdiction to review the county legislative body's apportionment, and shall have jurisdiction to make such orders and decrees amending the apportionment to comply with this section, or if the county legislative body fails to make apportionment, shall make a decree ordering an apportionment.

When a reapportionment is made, residents of a correctional institution who cannot by law register in the county as voters may be excluded from any consideration of representation.

Acts 1968, ch. 599, §§ 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 12; 1972, ch. 615, § 1; 1978, ch. 934, § 4; T.C.A., § 5-111; Acts 2002, ch. 653, § 1; 2016, ch. 954, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (h).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 954, § 2. April 27, 2016.

Cross-References. Consolidation of counties, redistricting, § 5-3-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 251; 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. A county commission could reduce the number of its members as part of a reapportionment plan, and no private act necessary, OAG 01-151, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 159 (9/25/01).

Vacancy on county commission. OAG 12-79, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (7/31/12).

5-1-112. Civil districts undisturbed by county legislative body reapportionment.

The recordkeeping role of the present civil districts shall be left undisturbed, and the boundaries of civil districts shall be preserved as they exist at the time of the apportionment of the county legislative bodies and on March 7, 1978.

Acts 1968, ch. 599, § 8; 1978, ch. 934, § 5; T.C.A., § 5-112.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 251.

5-1-113. Interlocal cooperation with municipalities.

The county legislative body of any county and the chief legislative body of any one (1) or more municipalities lying within the boundaries of the county are authorized and empowered to enter into any such agreements, compacts or contractual relations as may be desirable or necessary for the purpose of permitting the county and the municipality or municipalities to conduct, operate or maintain, either jointly or otherwise, desirable and necessary services or functions, under such terms as may be agreed upon by the county legislative body and the chief legislative body of the municipality or the chief legislative bodies of the municipalities.

Acts 1939, ch. 222, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.13 (Williams, § 10268.14); Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-113; Acts 1989, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross-References. Extension of facilities and services beyond boundaries of municipalities, § 7-52-103.

Extension of utility services, §§ 7-34-104, 7-35-401, 7-51-401.

Garbage services, interlocal cooperation, § 5-19-106.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, title 12, ch. 9.

Attorney General Opinions. A city and county were authorized to enter into an agreement to jointly acquire, construct, and maintain a new library on such terms as might be agreed upon by the parties, including the manner in which title to the real property would be held, OAG 00-169, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 172 (10/31/00).

Authority of a joint economic development board the board to acquire an industrial building and lease it to a private business on behalf of all of its constituent members, OAG 05-176, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 178 (12/13/05).

Conflicts of interest: joint economic and community development boards. OAG 12-09, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/20/12).

5-1-114. Interlocal cooperation between contiguous counties.

The county legislative bodies of any two (2) or more contiguous counties are empowered to enter into such agreements, contractual arrangements or compacts as they may deem necessary and desirable, in order to provide for the joint conducting or financing of any of the functions or services rendered by or through the county government.

Any county legislative body is empowered to enter into such agreements, contractual arrangements or compacts, as may be deemed necessary or desirable for the county to have any one (1) or more of its services or functions performed by and through the offices and officials of another county legislative body, and any county legislative body is authorized to enter into such agreements, contractual arrangements or compacts as may be deemed desirable or necessary to permit the offices and officials of such county legislative body to perform those services or functions for another county or counties.

Such services or functions shall be performed and provided for in accordance with the terms and conditions as agreed upon between the respective county legislative bodies.

Acts 1939, ch. 223, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.14 (Williams, § 10268.16); Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-114.

Cross-References. Garbage services, interlocal cooperation, § 5-19-106.

Home mortgages, interlocal cooperation, § 7-60-217.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, title 12, ch. 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Under T.C.A. § 5-1-114(a), contiguous counties may cooperate to develop an industrial park through an interlocal agreement, OAG 03-020, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (2/24/03).

Because development of an industrial park could be a “county general purpose” and a “public purpose,” counties may use property tax revenues generated by the industrial park to fulfill terms and conditions of an interlocal agreement, OAG 03-020, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (2/24/03).

5-1-115. Removal of vegetation and debris from certain lots.
[For Amendment contingent on county approval; see the Compiler's Notes.]

The authority in this section is permissive and not mandatory and may or may not be exercised by a county, as each county deems appropriate.

If it is determined by the appropriate department or person, as designated by the governing body of a county, that any owner of record of real property has created, maintained or permitted to be maintained on such property, the growth of trees, vines, grass, underbrush or the accumulation of debris, trash, litter, garbage, or any combination of the preceding elements, or a vacant dilapidated building or structure, so as to endanger the health, safety or welfare of other citizens, or to encourage the infestation of rats and other harmful animals, the appropriate department or person shall provide notice to the owner of record to remedy the condition immediately. The notice shall be given by United States mail, addressed to the last known address of the owner of record. The notice shall state that the owner of the property is entitled to a hearing. The notice shall be written in plain language and shall also include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

A brief statement of this section, which shall contain the consequences of failing to remedy the noted condition;

The person, office, address and telephone number of the department or person giving notice;

A cost estimate for remedying the noted condition, which shall be in conformity with the standards of cost in the community; and

A place wherein the notified party may return a copy of the notice, indicating the desire for a hearing.

If the person fails or refuses to remedy the condition within ten (10) days after receiving the notice, the appropriate department or person shall immediately cause the condition to be remedied or removed at a cost in conformity with reasonable standards and the cost thereof assessed against the owner of the property. The cost shall be a lien upon the property in favor of the county. These costs shall be placed upon the tax rolls of the county as a lien upon the property and shall be collected in the same manner as the county's taxes are collected, when the county causes a notice thereof to be filed in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the property lies, second only to liens of the state, county and municipality for taxes, any lien of the county for special assessments and any valid lien, right or interest in such property duly recorded or duly perfected by filing, prior to the filing of such notice. Such notice shall identify the owner of record of the real property, contain the property address, describe the property sufficiently to identify it and recite the amount of the obligation secured by the lien.

If the person who is the owner of record is a carrier engaged in the transportation of property or is a utility transmitting communications, electricity, gas, liquids, steam, sewerage or other materials, the ten-day period provided for in subdivision (c)(1) shall be twenty (20) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays.

The county governing body or the appropriate department, or both, may make any rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this section. The county shall provide for a hearing upon request of the person aggrieved by the determination made pursuant to subsection (b). A request for a hearing shall be made within ten (10) days following the receipt of the notice issued pursuant to subsection (b). Failure to make the request within this time shall without exception constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

Any person aggrieved by an order or act of the board, agency or commission under this subsection (d) may seek judicial review of the order or act. The time period established in subsection (c) shall be stayed during the pendency of a hearing.

Except in any county having a population of:

not less than nor more than

5,800 6,100

31,500 31,800

40,200 40,500

55,700 56,000

77,800 78,000

92,200 92,500

according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the provisions of subsection (c) permitting a county to remedy such dangerous conditions shall not apply to any parcel of property upon which an owner-occupied residence is located.

Notwithstanding subdivision (e)(1), in any county having a population of not less than sixty-nine thousand four hundred (69,400) nor more than sixty-nine thousand five hundred (69,500), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the provisions of subsection (c) permitting a county to remedy such dangerous conditions shall apply to any parcel of property, including any parcel upon which an owner-occupied residence is located.

This subsection (e) shall not apply to subsection (g).

Notwithstanding subdivision (e)(1), in any county having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand seven hundred (27,700) nor more than twenty-seven thousand eight hundred (27,800), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, subsection (c) permitting a county to remedy such dangerous conditions shall apply to any parcel of property, including any parcel upon which an owner-occupied residence is located.

Notwithstanding subdivision (e)(1), in any county having a population of not less than seventy-two thousand three hundred (72,300) nor more than seventy-two thousand four hundred (72,400), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, subsection (c) permitting a county to remedy such dangerous conditions shall apply to any parcel of property, including any parcel upon which an owner-occupied residence is located.

Notwithstanding subdivision (e)(1), in any county having a population of not less than thirty-eight thousand three hundred (38,300) and not more than thirty-eight thousand four hundred (38,400), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, subsection (c) permitting a county to remedy such dangerous conditions shall apply to any parcel of property, including any parcel upon which an owner-occupied residence is located.

Notwithstanding subdivision (e)(1), in any county having a population of not less than fifty-seven thousand four hundred (57,400) and not more than fifty-seven thousand five hundred (57,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, subsection (c) permitting a county to remedy such dangerous conditions shall apply to any parcel of property, including any parcel upon which an owner-occupied residence is located.

This section is in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, similar authority in any county's charter or other applicable law.

As used in this subsection (g):

“Community organization” means a community-oriented organization or group including, but not limited to, a school group, church youth group, neighborhood preservation nonprofit corporation, or community support group; and

“Vacant property” means property on which no building exists or on which a building exists but any such building is no longer utilized for any business, commercial or residential purposes.

If a person fails to remedy the condition on vacant property within the time period prescribed by subsection (c), subject to any stay as provided in subsection (d), upon the adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, to implement this subsection (g) within such county, a community organization shall be entitled to petition the county to enter upon such vacant property to remedy the conditions identified in subsection (b). Upon the filing of such a petition, the county is authorized to contract with such community organization for such purposes. The contract shall provide for the manner in which the community organization shall be compensated for remedying the conditions pursuant to such contract. Any county that contracts with a community organization for such purposes shall be absolutely immune from any liability to any and all persons and for damage to the vacant property for conditions remedied by the community organization. No monetary liability and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against the county for acts of omission or commission of such community organization for conditions remedied pursuant to such contract.

Acts 1989, ch. 49, § 1; 1990, ch. 941, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 997, § 1; 1994, ch. 894, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 613, § 1; 1999, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 791, § 1; 2003, ch. 3, § 1; 2006, ch. 530, § 1; 2010, ch. 923, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 963, § 2; 2015, ch. 258, § 1; 2016, ch. 681, § 1; 2017, ch. 303, § 1; 2018, ch. 815, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 894, § 4 provided that if any provision of that act, which amended this section, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, then all provisions and applications of that act are invalid and void.

Acts 2000, ch. 791, § 2 provided that this act shall have no effect in any county having a population of not less than 92,200 nor more than 92,500, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, unless it is approved by a two-thirds vote of the legislative body of such county. The text set out above reflects the amended section by ch. 791 if approved by the two-thirds vote.

Acts 2014, ch. 963, § 5 provided that the secretary of state is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, inserted “neighborhood preservation nonprofit corporation,” in (g)(1)(A).

The 2015 amendment added (e)(4).

The 2016 amendment added (e)(5).

The 2017 amendment added (e)(6).

The 2018 amendment added (e)(7).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 963, § 6. January 1, 2015; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules and making necessary provisions for the implementation of the act, this act shall take effect May 19, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 258, § 2. April 24, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 681, § 2. March 24, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 303, § 2. May 5, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 815, § 2. April 27, 2018.

Cross-References. Removal of vegetation and debris from certain lots, municipal power, § 6-54-113.

5-1-116. Building, safety and other standardized codes, incorporated by reference — Citations.

If the county legislative body or any agency or instrumentality thereof incorporates by reference a building code, safety and health code, or any other standardized code or document, a copy of such code or document shall be obtained and retained as a public record by the respective legislative body, agency or instrumentality.

If any person is cited by the county legislative body or any agency or instrumentality thereof as having violated a building code, safety and health code, or any other standardized code or document that has been incorporated by reference pursuant to subsection (a), a notation shall be included in such citation identifying with specificity where a copy of the respective code or document is located and the hours during which such person has the opportunity to read or inspect such code or document.

Acts 1993, ch. 478, § 1.

5-1-117. Sober ride programs.

In any county, including those having a metropolitan form of government, any department, agency, or office, working in conjunction with the sheriff's office of such county, may sponsor or participate in a “sober ride program”, which may include, but is not limited to, the provision of rides to persons who request transportation in order to avoid driving while under the influence of any intoxicant or drug.

Acts 1995, ch. 120, § 1.

5-1-118. County powers shared with municipalities.

Counties, by resolution of their respective legislative bodies, in addition to other powers authorized by general law or private act, may exercise the following powers granted to all or certain municipalities by the following code sections:

Section 6-2-201(3)-(8), (10)-(13), (18), (19), (26) and (28);

Section 6-54-103;

Section 6-54-110;

Section 6-54-307; and

Sections 6-54-601 — 6-54-603.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as granting counties the power to prohibit or regulate normal agricultural activities.

In addition to those powers granted to counties pursuant to subsection (a), any county may, by adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of their respective legislative bodies, exercise those powers granted to all or certain municipalities by § 6-2-201(22) and (23), except as provided in subsection (b) and subdivisions (c)(2) and (3). Any such regulations shall be enacted by a resolution passed by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body. The powers granted to counties in this subdivision (c)(1) apply only within the unincorporated areas. Nothing in this subdivision (c)(1) may be construed to allow any county to prohibit or in any way impede any municipality in exercising any power or authority the municipality may lawfully exercise. If, prior to April 17, 2002, a county has adopted a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote, pursuant to previous acts enacted by the general assembly, to exercise the powers granted in accordance with this subdivision (c)(1), no further action by the legislative body of such county is necessary to continue exercising such powers.

The powers granted by § 6-2-201(22) and (23) shall not apply to those activities, businesses, or uses of property and business occupations and practices that are subject to regulation pursuant to title 57, chapters 5 and 6; title 59, chapter 8; title 60, chapter 1; title 68, chapters 201-221; or title 69, chapters 3, 7, 10 and 11.

All court decisions and statutory laws relating to variances and nonconforming uses applicable to zoning ordinances and land use controls shall apply to the enforcement and exercise of those powers granted pursuant to subdivision (c)(1).

Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 1; 2000, ch. 969, § 1; 2001, ch. 7, § 1; 2002, ch. 627, § 1; 2003, ch. 57, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 2 provided that it is not the intent of the general assembly in enacting that act to allow any county to prohibit or in any way impede any municipality in exercising any power or authority the municipality may lawfully exercise.

Attorney General Opinions. County authority to establish rates for privately owned utility franchise, OAG 97-114, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 148 (8/14/97).

Proposed private act purporting to give a single county zoning and regulatory authority over business activities and property uses that are subject to regulation by the department of environment and would be inconsistent with general laws and would constitute invalid class legislation, OAG 04-105, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 123 (7/02/04).

Unless and until the legislature enacts legislation implementing a state lottery, which would include authorization for the sale of lottery tickets statewide, a local government may enact an ordinance prohibiting the sale of lottery tickets within its jurisdiction, OAG 03-004, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/17/03).

T.C.A. §§ 5-1-118(c)(1) and 5-1-120 implicitly authorize a county to regulate businesses that involve the keeping of dogs or cats and to charge a reasonable regulatory fee, OAG 06-161, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 181 (10/11/06).

County government authority to regulate an electric utility, OAG 07-028 (3/12/07).

Local governments may regulate itinerant vendors and temporary sales activity that takes place along a state highway, OAG 08-188, 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 233 (12/16/08).

Use of county funds to support referendum to increase local option sales tax. OAG 12-31, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (3/8/12).

Regulation of distribution of ephedrine and pseudoephedrine by local governments. OAG 13-99, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (12/6/13).

The definition of “agriculture” in T.C. A. §§ 1-3-105(a)(2)(A) and 43-1-113(b)(1) applies in determining the meaning of “agricultural” as used in T.C.A. § 5-1-118(b), T.C.A. § 5-1-122, and T.C.A. § 13-7-114. AG LEXIS 35 (7/26/2017).

Based on the applicable definitions of “agriculture” and “agricultural,” concentrated animal feeding operations (CAFOs) clearly involve “agricultural” activities and the “agricultural” use of land and structures. Thus, a county is not authorized to regulate CAFOs under its zoning powers or its general powers. T.C.A. § 44-18-104 merely sets forth which zoning requirements and regulations apply when determining whether a feedlot, dairy farm, or poultry production house is to be afforded absolute immunity from a nuisance claim, but it does not provide authority for a county to enact zoning requirements or regulations. T.C.A. § 13-7-114, which prevents counties from using their zoning power to regulate structures and land used for agricultural purposes, is not in conflict with T.C.A. § 44-18-104 because there is no independent source of zoning power bestowed upon any local entity under this right-to-farm law. T.C.A § 44-18-104(b) and (d) do not direct compliance with the section when no zoning requirements or regulations exist. When no zoning requirements or regulations exist, these provisions convey that a person’s compliance with the section is deemed to be established as a matter of law. OAG 18-30, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (7/6/2018).

5-1-119. Power to condemn property.

Counties, by resolution of their respective legislative bodies, may condemn property, real or personal, or any easement, interest, or estate or use therein, for present or future public use, either within or without the county, in accordance with the terms and provisions of title 29, chapter 16, or in any other manner provided by law, except that a county may not condemn property located outside of the county without receiving the approval of the county legislative body of the county wherein the land proposed to be taken for public use is located.

Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 264, § 2 provided that it is not the intent of the general assembly in enacting that act to allow any county to prohibit or in any way impede any municipality in exercising any power or authority the municipality may lawfully exercise.